Florida, session 2026, SB236.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 420.54, Florida Statutes, is created to 14 read: 15 420.54âVeteransâ Rental Assistance Grant Program.â 16 (1)âThe Legislature finds that: 17 (a)âHonorably discharged veterans have earned and deserve 18 the highest level of social welfare support. 19 (b)âHonorably discharged veterans deserve reasonable access 20 to housing. 21 (c)âSome honorably discharged veterans are only able to 22 secure housing through renting. 23 (d)âLower-income, honorably discharged veterans may not 24 have the financial means to provide a security deposit and first 25 and last monthâs rent, which many landlords require before 26 issuing a lease. 27 (e)âProviding rental assistance for eligible honorably 28 discharged veterans would help eliminate barriers to housing. 29 (2)âThe Veteransâ Rental Assistance Grant Program is 30 created to provide security deposit assistance for low-income, 31 honorably discharged veterans. 32 (3)âThe Florida Housing Finance Corporation is authorized 33 to provide one-time grants under the program from funds of the 34 corporation in amounts up to $2,000 to eligible applicants for 35 the purpose of assisting in the payment of security deposits for 36 rental housing. 37 (4)âTo be eligible to receive a rental assistance grant 38 under this section, a person must meet all of the following 39 requirements: 40 (a)âBe an honorably discharged veteran of a branch of the 41 United States Armed Forces. A DD-214 form issued at the time of 42 separation is required as proof of honorable discharge from a 43 branch of the United States Armed Forces. However, if a DD-214 44 form is not available, other documentation may be acceptable if 45 recognized by the United States Department of Defense or the 46 United States Department of Veterans Affairs, as determined by 47 the Florida Housing Finance Corporation. 48 (b)âBe a resident of this state. A Florida driver license 49 or Florida identification card is required as proof of 50 residency. 51 (c)âHave an annual household income that is at or below 140 52 percent of the area median income. Annual household income must 53 be verified in the manner required by the Florida Housing 54 Finance Corporation, which may include background checks and a 55 review of documentation such as bank statements and W-2 forms. 56 (d)âApply to the Florida Housing Finance Corporation in the 57 manner prescribed by the corporation. 58 (5)âThe Florida Housing Finance Corporation may adopt rules 59 to implement this section. 60 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.